Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Municipal Gas System Tax Equivalent Law of 1987

7-39-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Gas System Tax Equivalent Law of 1987.”

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 2.

7-39-402. Legislative intent — Construction.

The purpose of this part is to provide the complete law of this state with respect to payments in lieu of taxes on the property and operations of all gas systems owned and operated by incorporated cities or towns, by counties, and by metropolitan governments, and to repeal the specific provisions of any private act, home rule charter or metropolitan government charter, or any part of any private act, home rule charter or metropolitan government charter, relating to payments in lieu of taxes, except for provisions relating to the distribution of any such payments, but not to repeal any other provisions of such private acts or charters or parts of the private acts or charters. This part is remedial in nature and this part shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purpose of this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 3.

Cross-References. Payments in lieu of taxes, title 67, ch. 9.

7-39-403. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assessment ratio in effect” means that assessment ratio being applied by the comptroller of the treasury in assessing gas system property of private gas corporations for ad valorem taxation or, if such assessment function ceases to be performed by the comptroller of the treasury, that assessment ratio applied by any authorized department, agency, or official of the state empowered to so apply such an assessment ratio in assessing gas system property;

“Average of revenue less power cost from gas system operations for the preceding three (3) fiscal years” means an amount derived by:

Determining for each of the three (3) fiscal years immediately preceding the beginning of the current fiscal year, the gas system's total operating revenues for the year, less any operating revenue amounts deemed uncollectible and written off for the year, net of any such amounts reinstated during the year that had been written off in any prior fiscal year, and taking into account any extraordinary items attributable to any prior fiscal year's total operating revenue or uncollectible amounts, and totaling the three (3) yearly amounts so determined;

Determining for each of the same three (3) fiscal years described in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) the total costs of purchased gas, excluding any charges for facilities' rentals and taking into account any extraordinary items attributable to any prior fiscal year's purchased gas costs or facilities' rental charges, and totaling the three (3) yearly amounts so determined; and

Subtracting the total in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii) from the total in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) and dividing the resulting remainder by three (3);

For purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A), “any prior fiscal year” means any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 1984. Also, for purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A), all amounts described are those attributable only to gas system operations within Tennessee;

“Equalized property tax rate” of any taxing jurisdiction means the actual ad valorem property tax rate in effect multiplied by the applicable state, county, or municipal appraisal ratio for such taxing jurisdiction as determined by the state board of equalization, known as “state board” in this part. “Appraisal ratio” means the ratio of appraised values of record to one hundred percent (100%) of current values that are to be derived in accordance with applicable state law for use in ad valorem property tax determinations each tax year. For purposes of this part, the equalized property tax rate that is in effect for any taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of any gas system fiscal year shall be the same as an equalized property tax rate calculated for such taxing jurisdiction for that tax year, which is the calendar year, in which the fiscal year begins, using the actual property tax rate in effect for, and the appraisal ratio applicable for, such taxing jurisdiction for such tax year;

“Fiscal year” means the year beginning July 1 of each calendar year;

“Gas operations” means all activities associated with the establishment, development, and administration of a gas system and the business of supplying gas and associated services to the public, including, but not limited to, the generation, purchase, and sale of gas energy and the purchase, use, and consumption of gas energy by ultimate consumers;

“Gas system” means all tangible and intangible property and resources of every kind and description used or held for use in the purchase, generation, transmission, distribution, and sale of gas energy;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or town, metropolitan government, or county that now or hereafter owns and operates a gas system;

“Net plant value of the gas system plant” means the depreciated original cost of the gas plant, in service and held for future use, and the book value of construction work in progress, all as shown on the books of the gas system and all of which are for use in the transmission, and the distribution of gas;

“Private act” includes, without limitation, the charter and any amendments to the charter of any home rule municipality or any metropolitan government;

“Supervisory body” means any board or other agency of a municipality established to supervise the management and operation of its gas system and operations, or, in the absence of a board or other agency, the governing body of the municipality; and

“Taxing jurisdiction” means any county, incorporated city or town, or metropolitan government in Tennessee having the power to levy taxes, or any special taxing district in Tennessee on behalf of which ad valorem property taxes may be levied, for the support of governmental and related activities and services.

Terms appearing in this section, except where specifically defined, have the meanings defined or ascribed to them in the uniform system of accounts applicable to local governments.

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 4; 1995, ch. 305, § 76.

Cross-References. Uniform accounting system applicable to local governments, §9-2-102.

Attorney General Opinions. Providing natural gas within city limits. OAG 14-42, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (4/1/14).

7-39-404. Tax equivalents authorized — Conditions.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary in this code or in any private act, every municipality may pay or cause to be paid from its gas system revenues for each fiscal year an amount for payments in lieu of taxes, referred to as “tax equivalents”, on its gas system and gas operations, which, in the judgment of the municipality's governing body, shall represent the fair share cost of government properly to be borne by the municipality, subject, however, to the following conditions and limitations:

The total amount so paid as tax equivalents for each fiscal year shall not exceed a maximum amount equal to the sum of the following:

With respect to each of the respective taxing jurisdictions in which the municipality's gas system is located, the equalized property tax rate, determined as provided in this section, for the taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of such fiscal year, multiplied by the net plant value of the gas system and the book value of materials and supplies within the taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of such fiscal year, multiplied by the assessment ratio in effect as of the beginning of such fiscal year; and

Four percent (4%) of the average of revenue less cost of gas from gas operations for the preceding three (3) fiscal years;

Such tax equivalent payments shall be made only from gas system revenues remaining after payment of, or making reasonable provision for payment of:

Current gas system operating expenses, including salaries, wages, cost of materials and supplies, power at wholesale, and insurance;

Current payments of interest on indebtedness incurred or assumed by a municipality for the acquisition, extension, or improvement of the gas system, and the payment of principal amounts of such indebtedness, including sinking fund payments, when due;

Reasonable reserves for renewals, replacements, and contingencies; and

Cash working capital adequate to cover operating expenses for a reasonable number of weeks;

The total amount to be paid as tax equivalents for each fiscal year shall be in lieu of all state, county, city, and other local taxes or charges on the municipality's gas system and gas operations except as provided in subdivision (6);

The total amount to be paid as tax equivalents, including that to be paid for the municipality and any other taxing jurisdiction, for each fiscal year, determined in accordance with and subject to this part, shall be set forth in a resolution adopted by the municipality's governing body after consultation with the supervisory body, if different from the governing body, and the municipality's gas system shall pay to the municipality and any other specified taxing jurisdictions amounts as provided in that resolution. Such determination shall be made as early in such fiscal year as possible and shall become final at the end of such year;

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1)-(4), until the first fiscal year in which the aforementioned maximum amount for tax equivalents, calculated as provided in subdivision (1), exceeds the tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987, the maximum tax equivalent amount that may be paid for any fiscal year shall not be less than the maximum tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987. Thereafter, such maximum amount for any fiscal year shall not exceed the maximum amount calculated as provided in subdivision (1). All such maximum amounts shall be subject to the conditions and limitations of subdivisions (2)-(4); and

Notwithstanding anything in subdivisions (1)-(5) that might be construed to the contrary, properly authorized retail sales or use taxes on gas energy at the same rates applicable generally to sales or use of personal property or services shall not be considered a tax or charge on the municipality's gas system or its gas operations or properties for purposes of this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 5.

7-39-405. Payment of tax equivalents.

The municipality's governing body, in the resolution provided for in § 7-39-404(4), shall direct payment of the amounts to be paid as tax equivalents to the taxing jurisdictions in which its gas plant in service is located in accordance with and subject to any terms, conditions, contracts or agreements now in effect.

Notwithstanding any private act or home rule charter, or any part thereof, relating to the distribution of payments in lieu of taxes, unless a written agreement was executed prior to April 2012, or becomes effective on the first day of any fiscal year thereafter, by another taxing jurisdiction and a municipality, located in any county having a charter form of government, that owns and operates a gas system, and such written agreement provides for a different payment, then each taxing jurisdiction shall receive a payment that is equal to that portion of the total tax equivalent payment that is calculated using each such taxing jurisdiction’s tax rate pursuant to § 7-39-404(1)(A).

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 6; 2012, ch. 984, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of amendments by Acts 2012, ch. 984. OAG 12-72, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 77 (7/18/12).

7-39-406. Conflicting provisions repealed.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, all acts or parts of acts, including parts of any private act, or home rule, or metropolitan government charter, in conflict with this part, are to the extent of such conflict herewith repealed.

Acts 1987, ch. 220, § 7.